Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.135

Center for the improvement of student learning account.

(1) The center for the improvement of student learning account is hereby established in the custody of the state treasurer. The superintendent of public instruction shall deposit in the account all moneys received from gifts, grants, or endowments for the center for the improvement of student learning. Moneys in the account may be spent only for activities of the center. Disbursements from the account shall be on authorization of the superintendent of public instruction or the superintendent's designee. The account is subject to the allotment procedure provided under chapter 43.88 RCW, but no appropriation is required for disbursements.

(2) The superintendent of public instruction may receive such gifts, grants, and endowments from public or private sources as may be made from time to time, in trust or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the purposes of the center for the improvement of student learning and expend the same or any income therefrom according to the terms of the gifts, grants, or endowments.

[ 1993 c 336 s 502.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Part headings not law—1993 c 336: See notes following RCW 28A.150.210.

Findings—1993 c 336: See note following RCW 28A.150.210.